Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-2306
Payments for equipment and software
to administer examinations.

Using the funds allocated from the Education Innovation
Fund pursuant to subdivision (4)(c)(viii) of section 9-812, the State Department
of Education shall provide each institution offering a high school equivalency
program a one-time payment for the acquisition and upgrade of equipment and
software necessary to administer examinations for diplomas of high school
equivalency.

Laws 2013, LB366, § 6.
June 5, 2013